Utah statutes.
78B-6-309.   Hearing.

When the person arrested has been brought up or has appeared, the court shall proceed to investigate the charge, and hear any answer which the person arrested may make.  The court may examine witnesses for or against the person arrested, for which an adjournment may be had from time to time, if necessary.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

